Florida, session 2026, SB1230.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âJoe Casello Act.â 32 Section 2.âSection 376.911, Florida Statutes, is created to 33 read: 34 376.911âAqueous film-forming foam.â 35 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 36 (a)ââAqueous film-forming foamâ means any firefighting foam 37 containing intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and 38 polyfluoroalkyl substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid and 39 perfluorooctane sulfonate as defined by the United States 40 Environmental Protection Agency. 41 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Environmental 42 Protection. 43 (2)âEffective July 1, 2026: 44 (a)âAqueous film-forming foam may not be used for any 45 nonemergency instruction, training, or testing. 46 (b)âAll entities in possession of aqueous film-forming foam 47 must report inventories to the department. 48 (3)âEffective July 1, 2027: 49 (a)âThe sale, purchase, or distribution of aqueous film 50 forming foam within this state is prohibited. 51 (b)âAll entities with remaining inventories of aqueous 52 film-forming foam must submit a disposal plan to the department. 53 (4)âEffective July 1, 2029, the possession and use of 54 aqueous film-forming foam is prohibited in this state. 55 (5)âThe prohibition under subsection (4) does not apply to: 56 (a)âAirports as defined in s. 330.27. 57 (b)âMilitary applications where alternatives do not exist. 58 (c)âEmergency firefighting situations where alternative 59 firefighting foam is not available, including mutual aid where 60 state or local firefighting authorities may not have adequate 61 equipment to dispense alternatives. 62 (d)âSpecific aqueous film-forming foam retrofit projects 63 submitted under an application with state or local firefighting 64 authorities. 65 (6)âThe department shall: 66 (a)âAdopt rules for containment, collection, and disposal 67 of aqueous film-forming foam. 68 (b)âMaintain a registry of firefighting foam alternatives 69 that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 70 substances. 71 (c)âProvide technical assistance and grants for transition 72 to products that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and 73 polyfluoroalkyl substances. 74 (7)âThe department may administer grants or cost-share 75 programs to assist local fire departments and airports in 76 transitioning to products that do not contain perfluoroalkyl and 77 polyfluoroalkyl substances. 78 (8)âA person who violates this act is subject to: 79 (a)âCivil penalties not to exceed $10,000 for each 80 violation for each day the violation persists. 81 (b)âAdditional penalties for failure to report inventories 82 or submit disposal plans. 83 (9)âThe department may seek injunctive relief to enforce 84 compliance with this section. 85 Section 3.âSubsection (12) is added to section 403.086, 86 Florida Statutes, to read: 87 403.086âSewage disposal facilities; advanced and secondary 88 waste treatment.â 89 (12)(a)âAll public entities disposing of domestic 90 wastewater biosolids and treated effluent that have a designed 91 average daily flow of 25,000 or more gallons per day must 92 quarterly conduct at least one biosolids and treated effluent 93 sampling, as applicable, for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 94 substances, including perfluorooctanoic acid and perfluorooctane 95 sulfonate, and submit the results to the department. The 96 sampling must be conducted in accordance with department rules. 97 (b)âUntil water quality standards for perfluoroalkyl and 98 polyfluoroalkyl substances are established by the United States 99 Environmental Protection Agency and adopted by the department, 100 the sampling and reporting conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) 101 is for informational purposes only and may not be the basis for 102 any department enforcement action or other cause of action. 103 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.